Arkansas, session 2025, HB1069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 1, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
1-1-104. Observation of standard time.
(a) The State of Arkansas, acting under the exemption provision of the
Uniform Time Act of 1966, 15 U.S.C. § 260a(a), is exempt from the provisions
of that law that establish daylight saving time.
(b) The standard time in Arkansas shall be the solar time of the
ninetieth meridian west of Greenwich, commonly known as central standard
time.
(c) This section shall not be construed to affect the standard time
established by United States law governing the movements of common carriers
engaged in interstate commerce or the time for performance of an act by an
officer or department of the United States, as established by statute, lawful
order, rule, or regulation of the United States or an agency of the United
States.
(d) If it may be reasonably accommodated, state employees shall be
*LGL026*
02-13-2025 10:39:19 LGL026

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1069
provided the ability to adjust their work schedule one (1) hour earlier to a
time that corresponds with daylight saving time during the portion of the
year when other states observe daylight saving time.
(e)(1) The Secretary of State shall continually monitor action by the
United States Government and determine whether 15 U.S.C. § 260a has been
amended to require states to observe daylight saving time permanently.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if the
Secretary of State makes the determination required under subdivision (e)(1)
of this section:
(A) The Secretary of State shall inform the Governor, the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, and the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research within five
(5) business days of making the determination; and
(B) The state shall observe daylight saving time year-
round as the standard time in the State of Arkansas while the requirement to
observe daylight saving time permanently is in place and revert to observing
standard time year-round if the requirement to observe daylight saving time
permanently is repealed.

/s/S. Meeks
















02-13-2025 10:39:19 LGL026